src/fst/morphology/stems/interjections.lexc
LEXICON ij
+Interj: # ;

LEXICON iph
+Ideophone: # ;

LEXICON Ideophones
dilh iph ;
kurruwirluk iph ;

LEXICON Interjections
aba ij ;
adjuh ij ;
awurd ij ;
bawh ij ;
bobo ij ;
bonj ij ;
burrkyak ij ;
kab ij ;
kah ij ;
kare ij ;
karrimen ij ;
kayakki ij ;
kek ij ;
ken ij ;
kornbayeng ij ;
kub ij ;
larrk ij ;
ma ij ;
med ij ;
ngakukwarre ij ;
ngamed ij ;
nja ij ;
njamed ij ;
njonj ij ;
nuk ij ;
warddaw ij ;
waw ij ;
wurra ij ;
ya ij ;
yoh ij ;
yowayh ij ;
